Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2,129
Code, how cited.

Sections 43-245 to 43-2,129 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Juvenile Code.

Laws 1981, LB 346, § 85;

Laws 1985, LB 447, § 35;

Laws 1989, LB 182, § 19;

Laws 1994, LB 1106, § 8;

Laws 1997, LB 622, § 74;

Laws 1998, LB 1041, § 31;

Laws 1998, LB 1073, § 27;

Laws 2000, LB 1167, § 23;

Laws 2003, LB 43, § 16;

Laws 2006, LB 1115, § 32;

Laws 2008, LB1014, § 42;

Laws 2010, LB800, § 31;

Laws 2011, LB463, § 11;

Laws 2013, LB561, § 25;

Laws 2014, LB464, § 26;

Laws 2015, LB482, § 6;

Laws 2017, LB180, § 2;

Laws 2018, LB990, § 7;

Laws 2025, LB530, § 22.